Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Ballots and Supplies

2-5-201. Printing of ballots.

All ballots used in elections shall be printed and made as provided in this chapter except to the extent that other sections of this title expressly provide otherwise.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-501.

Cross-References. English deemed official and legal language, §4-1-404.

2-5-202. Separate general and primary election ballots.

Each county election commission shall have printed separate general and primary election ballots on which shall be only the names of candidates who have qualified and who are to be voted on at the polling place in which the ballots are to be used.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-502.

Attorney General Opinions. The qualifications of a person to hold the office of state senator may be challenged at two different times: first, at the time of placement of qualified candidates' names on the ballot by a county election commission prior to the election; and, second, after the election but prior to the taking of the oath in an election contest in the state senate, OAG 02-032 (3/15/02).

2-5-203. Independent candidates.

Candidates who are not to be placed on ballots as nominees of a political party shall be known as “independent candidates.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-504.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutory requirements concerning placement of independent candidate for president of the united states on ballot. 33 A.L.R.6th 513.

2-5-204. Placing of names on ballots — Withdrawal or disqualification of candidate — Death of candidate.

Each qualified candidate's name shall be placed on the ballot as it appears on the candidate's nominating petitions unless the candidate dies before the ballots are printed, or unless the candidate requests in writing that the candidate's name not appear on the ballot and files the request with each of the officers with whom the candidate filed nominating petitions or to whom the candidate's nomination was certified as a political party nominee, or unless the executive committee with which a primary candidate filed the original petition determines that the candidate is not qualified under § 2-13-104.

A candidate's request to withdraw shall be filed no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the seventh day after the qualifying deadline for the election. A candidate who qualifies pursuant to § 2-5-101(g)(1) or who is nominated pursuant to § 2-13-204(c) must file any request to withdraw no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the third day after the qualifying deadline.

An executive committee that determines that a candidate is not qualified under § 2-13-104 shall file the committee's determination with the coordinator of elections no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the seventh day after the qualifying deadline for the election. The coordinator of elections shall notify each county election commission on whose ballots the candidate's name would otherwise appear prior to the election commission printing the ballot.

If an executive committee submits a candidate's name to be excluded from the ballot pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(A), the executive committee shall provide the candidate written notice of the exclusion within two (2) days after submission. The executive committee shall mail the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or any form of expedited mail that requires a signature at receipt, to the residential address or the business address of the candidate as listed on the candidate's nominating petition. The executive committee shall retain the return receipts, or other documentation of timely notification, for a period of not less than one (1) year from the date the notification was sent. The candidate may appeal the determination in writing and must file the original appeal with the executive committee and a copy of the appeal with the coordinator of elections within two (2) days of receipt of the notice from the executive committee. Unless the coordinator of elections receives a letter from the executive committee withdrawing the committee's determination of the candidate's disqualification no later than the close of business seven (7) days after the original withdrawal deadline, the candidate's name must be excluded from the ballot. The executive committee may file the withdrawal letter with the coordinator of elections by fax, email, hand delivery, or through a priority mail process.

The appeal process described in subdivision (b)(2)(B) does not apply to a special primary or special general election to fill the vacancy for members of the general assembly or the office of representatives in congress.

If no less than four (4) members of the county election commission vote in the affirmative that a candidate's name on the ballot would be confusing or misleading, the county election commission may require further identifying information or may omit any confusing or misleading portion of the name. In an election where the candidate's name will appear on the ballot in more than one (1) county, this authority shall rest with the state election commission.

No titles may be printed with the candidate's name.

If a candidate dies within forty (40) days before the election, the decedent's name shall remain on the ballot. If the deceased candidate receives the necessary votes to otherwise be elected, then a vacancy shall exist. The vacancy shall be filled as otherwise provided for by law.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-509; Acts 1988, ch. 933, § 14; 1989, ch. 128, § 2; 1999, ch. 6, § 3; 1999, ch. 197, § 6; 2001, ch. 413, § 2; 2019, ch. 441, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b)(2), which read: “An executive committee's determination shall be filed with the chair or administrator of elections of each county election commission on whose ballots the candidate's name would otherwise appear no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the seventh day after the qualifying deadline for the election.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 441, § 2. May 22, 2019.

2-5-205. Presidential preference primary — Printing of names on ballot — Withdrawal of name.

The names of candidates for president of the United States shall be printed on the ballot for the presidential preference primary only if they are:

The names of persons whom the secretary of state, in the secretary of state's sole discretion, has determined are generally advocated or recognized as candidates in national news media throughout the United States. The secretary of state shall submit the names to the state election commission no later than the first Tuesday in December of the year before the year in which the election will be held. If a candidate who has been certified by the secretary of state wishes to be a candidate in the presidential primary of a party other than that for which the secretary of state certified the candidate, the candidate shall signify the candidate's political party preference to the state election commission no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the date established in subsection (b), and the candidate's name shall be certified only for the ballot of the candidate's chosen party, as the case may be.

The names of persons for whom nominating petitions, signed by at least two thousand five hundred (2,500) registered voters of the party whose nomination is sought and by the candidate, are filed not later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Tuesday in December of the year before the year in which the election will be held. The nominating petitions shall be filed with the state election commission and certified duplicates with the coordinator of elections and with the chair of the candidate's party's state executive committee. No candidate may enter the presidential primary of more than one (1) statewide political party.

The secretary of state shall advise each of the prospective candidates by the most expeditious means available that, unless a candidate withdraws the candidate's name by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the second Tuesday in December of the year before the year in which the election will be held, the candidate's name will appear on the ballot of the candidate's party in the presidential preference primary. If such a person executes and files with the state election commission an affidavit stating without qualification that the candidate is not and does not intend to become a candidate for president in the forthcoming presidential election, the candidate's name shall not be on the ballot.

The secretary of state shall certify to the county election commissions on the third Thursday in December the names which this section requires to be on the ballot for each political party.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 439, § 1; 1977, ch. 316, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-510; Acts 1986, ch. 562, §§ 1-4; 1987, ch. 409, §§ 1-5; 2003, ch. 374, §§ 14-17.

Cross-References. Presidential preference primaries, date of election, failure to have candidate's name on ballot, §2-13-205.

Presidential preference primary and convention delegates, title 2, ch. 13, part 3.

2-5-206. Forms of ballots on voting machines.

Voting machine ballot labels and names of candidates shall be printed in black ink with office titles printed in black or red ink on clear material of such size as will fit the ballot frame and in as plain, clear type as the space will reasonably permit.

All voting machine ballots shall be arranged as follows:

In primary elections, the title of the offices shall be placed vertically on the left or right side of the ballot, and there shall be a vertical column for each political party, and the names of the candidates shall be placed opposite the title of the office for which they are to be selected, in alphabetical order according to the initials of their surname, beginning with the first initial. Each column shall be designated by the name of the political party for that column;

In general elections, the title of the offices shall be placed vertically on the left or the right side of the ballot, and there shall be a vertical column for each political party. Any candidate whose name is to be placed on the ballot by virtue of party nomination shall be listed in the political column of such candidate's party, opposite the title of the office the candidate seeks. One (1) vertical column for independent candidates shall be placed on the ballot and shall appear immediately after the political party columns. The independent candidates shall be listed in alphabetical order according to the initials of their surnames, beginning with the first initial. The independent candidate's name shall be listed opposite the title of the office the candidate seeks. This ballot format shall apply to all voting machine ballots, except in counties using Automatic Voting Machine, Inc. type machines, C.E.S., Votomatic or comparable punch card voting systems, or Shouptronic or other comparable direct recording electronic voting systems. Any county using Automatic Voting Machine, Inc. type machines shall arrange its machine ballots in the following manner, to wit: the title of offices shall be placed in vertical columns and the names of the candidates shall be placed in horizontal columns with each political party having its own columns and the independents being placed in a single column or columns after the political party columns; with such candidates' names being listed alphabetically according to the initials of their surname, beginning with the first initial. The ballot format for C.E.S., Inc., Votomatic, or other comparable punch card systems shall be governed by the rules set out by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission under § 2-9-110. The ballot format for Shouptronic or other comparable direct recording electronic voting systems shall be governed by the rules set out by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission under § 2-9-110. Such rules shall be approved by not less than four (4) members of the state election commission;

If the arrangement as set out in subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) will not fit on the voting machine ballot, the county election commission may arrange the ballot so that the voting machine will accommodate the entire ballot including, without limitation, the arrangement of material in vertical columns with the office appearing first and the candidates for such office listed vertically beneath the office, with political party nominees indicated by (D) or (R) and independent candidates by (I); and

Any county using a punch card format system which places an identifying number on the punch card ballot shall place the corresponding number by each position or name displayed on the ballot pages.

The county election commission of each county shall prepare a sample ballot of all candidates and mail this sample ballot to the coordinator of elections for approval. No ballot shall be printed or funds expended therefor by any county until such approval has been granted. The coordinator of elections must give approval or disapproval within ten (10) days of the receipt of the sample ballot.

If the coordinator of elections or the state election commission fails to correct promptly any alleged defect in any ballot, whether for voting machine, paper ballot, or otherwise, a candidate, the candidate's representative, or other party deemed to have standing may apply to the chancery court in the county wherein the allegedly defective ballot may be used, for any appropriate relief under this code or the rules of civil procedure.

Should there be so many candidates or questions, or both, to be voted upon in any election, as to exceed the capacity of a voting machine, paper ballots shall be provided for each polling place, to hold the entire ballot. Where paper ballots are required to list the entire ballot, the names of all candidates for any one (1) particular office shall be printed on the same paper ballot.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e)(1), in any county where a voting machine will not accommodate the entire ballot, the coordinator of elections may, with the approval of the county election commission, permit the placement of part of the ballot on paper ballots. In considering the priority in which parts of the ballot should be placed on paper ballots, the coordinator shall first permit the placement of the candidates for the court of appeals and the court of criminal appeals on paper ballots. Next, the coordinator shall permit the placement of the unopposed candidates for countywide positions on paper ballots; provided, that no candidate who is unopposed in a primary election shall be placed on paper ballots. In any county having a population of not less than one hundred forty-three thousand nine hundred (143,900) nor more than one hundred forty-four thousand (144,000) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the coordinator shall permit the placement of candidates in nonpartisan elections for county commission on paper ballots.

The machine shall be so adjusted that when one (1) or more voting pointers equaling the total number of persons to be elected to an office shall have been operated, all other voting pointers connected with that office shall be locked. The machines shall be so adjusted that no voter may vote in more than one (1) party's primary election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 353, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 2-512; Acts 1982, ch. 871, § 3; 1989, ch. 274, §§ 3, 4; 1989, ch. 573, § 1; 1989, ch. 574, § 1; 1990, ch. 628, § 4; 1990, ch. 797, § 1; 1997, ch. 331, § 1; 2000, ch. 756, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Arrangement of material on ballots, §2-5-208.

Voting machines, title 2, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Form and layout of ballot used on voting machines, OAG 06-154 (10/5/06).

2-5-207. Form of paper ballots.

The state election commission shall establish a uniform maximum and minimum width for all paper ballots. Paper ballots shall be of such length and width as the county election commission deems necessary to contain the offices, names of the candidates, and questions required to be printed, with a stub containing a number.

On the front or back of paper ballots shall be conspicuously printed the words, “Official Ballot for (General) ( Party Primary) Election,” followed by the designation of the polling place for which the ballot is prepared, the date of the election, and the names of the members of the county election commission holding the election. The size of the print may not be less than ten (10) point.

Except in counties using an electronic ballot marking system or ballot-on-demand technology approved by the coordinator of elections, all paper ballots for use in a polling place must be fastened together in convenient numbers in books so that each ballot may be detached and removed separately. Each stub must be attached to the ballot so that when the ballot is folded, the stub can be detached without injury to the ballot and without exposing its contents. Each stub must be serially numbered by the printer, and no two (2) ballots for use in a single precinct may have the same number. The commission shall keep a record of the numbers of the ballots supplied to each polling place.

On paper ballots, the titles of the offices shall be printed vertically on the left side of the ballot. There shall be a sufficient number of columns to list all political party nominees, independents and uncontested races, each political party and the independents having a column of its own. Any candidate whose name is to be placed on the ballot by virtue of party nomination shall be listed in the political column of the candidate's party, opposite the title of the office the candidate seeks. The independent candidate's name shall also be placed opposite the title of the office such candidate seeks. One (1) column will be left blank for each race, for the purpose of write-in candidates.

Whenever primary elections are being held to select nominees, the names of the candidates shall be listed in alphabetical order, according to the initials of their surname, beginning with the first initial, in the column of their respective political party.

The county election commission of each county shall prepare a sample ballot of all candidates listed in § 2-13-202 and shall mail this sample ballot to the coordinator of elections for approval. No ballot shall be printed or funds expended therefor by any county until such approval has been granted.

The coordinator of elections shall determine distinguishable colors to be used in the printing of the ballot envelopes for early voting and absentee voting. Both envelopes shall include a place for the voter's precinct and district number and a statement for the administrator of elections to sign stating that the voter's signature has been verified and appears to be valid. The absentee voting ballot envelope need not contain a certificate for an attesting official.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 353, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-513; Acts 1988, ch. 933, § 7; 1994, ch. 859, § 8; 2007, ch. 125, § 2; 2020, ch. 655, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (c), substituted “must” for “shall” in the first three sentences and “Except in counties using an electronic ballot marking system or ballot-on-demand technology approved by the coordinator of elections, all paper ballots” for “All paper ballots” in the beginning of the subsection.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Absentee voting, ch. 6, title 2, ch. 6, part 2.

Early voting, title 2, ch. 6, part 1.

2-5-208. Arrangement of material on ballots.

The requirements of this section apply to all ballots.

Immediately following the title of each office shall be printed the words “Vote for one (1),” “Vote for two (2),” according to the number to be elected.

The order of the titles of the offices to be filled or for which nominees are to be chosen shall be substantially as follows:

Presidential and vice presidential electors;

Governor;

United States senate;

United States house of representatives;

Tennessee senate;

Tennessee house of representatives;

Supreme court judge;

Court of appeals judge;

Court of criminal appeals judge;

Circuit court judge;

Chancellor;

Criminal court judge;

District attorney general;

Public defender;

County mayors, including popularly elected mayors of metropolitan county governments;

County legislative offices, including members of the county legislative bodies;

Assessor of property;

County trustee;

General sessions judge;

Juvenile court judge;

Sheriff;

Clerks of courts;

County clerk;

Register;

Elective county department offices, including road superintendents or commissioners, school boards and purchasing agents;

Municipal executive offices;

Municipal legislative offices;

Municipal judicial offices; and

Offices which do not fall into any classification listed in this subdivision (c)(1).

If several offices to be filled are within a single classification, they shall be arranged in alphabetical order.

If any judicial offices listed in subdivision (c)(1) are to be placed on the ballot as a yes/no retention question, the question shall be placed at the end of the ballot.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or this title, on general election ballots, the name of each political party having nominees on the ballot shall be listed in the following order: majority party, minority party, and recognized minor party, if any. The names of the political party candidates shall be alphabetically listed underneath the appropriate column for the candidate's party. A column for independent candidates shall follow the recognized minor party, or if there is not a recognized minor party on the ballot, shall follow the minority party, with the listing of the candidates' names alphabetically underneath.

On nonpartisan general election ballots and on the political party's primary ballot, the names of all candidates for the same office shall be arranged alphabetically according to the initials of their surnames, beginning with the first initial.

No number may be prefixed before or affixed after the names of candidates for any office so as to designate by number the order in which candidates' names are on the ballot for any office. The limitation set out in this subsection (e) does not prohibit the printing of numerals on the face of punch cards or ballots used with the microvote electronic voting system.

Whenever a question is submitted to the vote of the people, it shall be placed at the end of the ballot, followed by the words “Yes” and “No”, so that the voter can vote a preference by making a cross mark (X) opposite the proper word. If a retention judicial question is on the ballot as provided for in subdivision (c)(3), this question shall be placed after the retention judicial question; provided, that whenever the question of a state constitutional amendment is submitted to the vote of the people pursuant to article XI, § 3, paragraph 1 of the Tennessee Constitution, it shall be printed upon the ballot directly after the list of candidates for governor followed by the words “Yes” and “No”, so that the voter can vote a preference by making a cross mark (X) opposite the proper word. Any question submitted to the people shall be worded in such a manner that a “yes” vote would indicate support for the measure and a “no” vote would indicate opposition.

If the full statement of a question is more than three hundred (300) words in length, the question shall be preceded by a brief summary of the proposal written in a clear and coherent manner using words with common everyday meanings. Such summary shall not exceed two hundred (200) words in length. The summary shall be written by the attorney general and reporter for questions submitted to the voters of the entire state or of more than one (1) county or by the county attorney of the county in which the question is to be voted upon for questions to be submitted to the voters of one (1) county or any part of a county. The summary for questions submitted to the voters of a municipality shall be written by the city attorney of the municipality in which the question is to be voted upon.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f)(2)(A), if the question is a state constitutional amendment, the question shall be preceded by a brief summary of the proposal written in a clear and coherent manner using words with common everyday meanings. Such summary shall not exceed two hundred (200) words in length. The summary shall be written by the attorney general and reporter.

The ballot for each political party's presidential preference primary shall be headed “Candidates of the Party for President of the United States.” Beneath the heading shall be “I declare my preference for candidate for the office of President of the United States to be:” followed by the names of the candidates.

The names of presidential candidates shall be arranged according to political parties, and followed by the words, (giving the name) for president and (giving the name) for vice president. Names of electors need not appear on the ballot.

When there are so many candidates for an office that their names will not all fit either horizontally or vertically on the ballot with the name of the office, the names shall be listed in alphabetical rotation from left to right in each necessary row in the following manner:

[ ] ADAMS [ ] BLACK [ ] CONWAY

[ ] SMITH [ ] THOMAS [ ] THOMS

[ ] VADEN

Each state primary board shall prescribe a color for its party's primary ballots which shall be uniform throughout the state and different from every other party's.

At the time of qualification for judge of the supreme court, the candidate shall state on the qualifying petition the grand division in which the candidate resides and the particular seat on the supreme court for which the candidate seeks election. The county election commission shall cause the names of the candidates to be arranged on the ballot so as to denote the grand division for which they are seeking to be elected or whether they are candidates from the state at large by prefixing to the names of the candidates the words “eastern,” “western” or “middle” division or “the state at large.”

On ballots in a referendum election held by a local government, any question submitted to the vote of the people shall be printed followed by the words “Yes” and “No”, so that the voter can vote a preference by making a cross mark (X) opposite the proper word. Any question submitted to the people shall be worded in such a manner that a “yes” vote would indicate support for the measure and a “no” vote would indicate opposition.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 708, § 1; 1975, ch. 353, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 29; T.C.A., §§ 2-308, 2-514; Acts 1981, ch. 110, § 1; 1981, ch. 246, § 1; 1981, ch. 300, § 1; 1983, ch. 20, § 1; 1988, ch. 672, § 3; 1990, ch. 628, § 5; 1995, ch. 305, § 56; 1996, ch. 574, § 1; 1997, ch. 331, § 2; 1997, ch. 558, § 5; 2000, ch. 756, §§ 9, 10, 11; 2000, ch. 883, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 183, § 1; 2007, ch. 125, § 9; 2011, ch. 257, § 3; 2013, ch. 231, § 6; 2016, ch. 579, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2000, ch. 883, § 1 provided that the act may be cited as the “Fair Ballot Access Act of 2000.”

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (f)(2)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 579, § 2. March 10, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Election officials are bound by law to use the title “county mayors” and not “county executives” on primary and general election ballots for that office after July 1, 2003, OAG 03-096 (8/13/03).

Form and layout of ballot used on voting machines, OAG 06-154 (10/5/06).

2-5-209. Number of paper ballots for each precinct — Number reserved for emergency use — Use of ballot-on-demand technology.

The coordinator of elections shall determine the minimum number of paper ballots furnished to each precinct on election day and the number of paper ballots to be held in reserve by the county election commission for emergency use.

Any county election commission desiring to use ballot-on-demand technology must have approval by the coordinator of elections sixty (60) days before any election.

The coordinator of elections and the state election commission must provide an approved list of available ballot-on-demand technology vendors from which the county election commission must select for use.

Prior to the county election commission voting to utilize ballot-on-demand technology, the county election commission must hold a public meeting with an opportunity for public comment.

During the public meeting held pursuant to subdivision (b)(2), the county election commission must provide election officials and members of the public who are present an opportunity to have demonstrated to them the ballot-on-demand technology machines and the opportunity to experiment with the ballot-on-demand technology machines being considered for use in the county.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 441, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-515; Acts 1988, ch. 672, § 2; 2006, ch. 642, § 3; 2010, ch. 612, § 8; 2011, ch. 342, § 1.

2-5-210. Instruction cards.

The coordinator of elections shall provide the county election commission with instruction cards for each polling place in large, clear type. The instruction cards shall contain full instructions for the guidance of voters in obtaining ballots or admission to voting machines, in casting their votes, in obtaining assistance, and in obtaining new ballots in place of those accidentally spoiled or in moving from an inoperative machine to a functioning one.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-516.

2-5-211. Sample ballots.

The county election commission shall provide two (2) sample ballots for each polling place, arranged in the manner of the paper ballots for the polling place where voting machines are not used, but arranged in the form of a diagram showing the part of the face of the voting machine in use at that election where voting machines are used. Sample ballots may be either full or reduced size and shall contain suitable illustrated instructions for voting; provided, that in any county in which the votomatic punch card system is used, the county election commission may use copies of the guide page ballot as sample ballots.

At least five (5) days before the beginning of an early voting period and at least five (5) days before an election, the county election commission shall:

Publish a sample ballot in a newspaper of general circulation. Where voting machines are used, the sample ballot shall be the machine sample ballot. The sample ballot shall contain the names of all candidates and all offices and a statement of all questions on which voters may vote. A sample ballot does not have to be published in a newspaper of general circulation if a sample ballot that complies with this section has been mailed at least five (5) days prior to the beginning of the early voting period to every active registered voter. If more than one (1) registered voter is at the same address, then only one (1) sample ballot may be sent to that address; and

Post a sample ballot on a web site maintained by the county election commission or, if the county election commission does not have or maintain a web site, on the web site maintained by the secretary of state. The sample ballot shall contain the names of all candidates and all offices and a statement of all questions on which voters may vote.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-517; Acts 1981, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 88, § 11; 2004, ch. 480, § 5; 2008, ch. 1066, § 1; 2013, ch. 179, § 3.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

2-5-212. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-5-212 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-518), concerning the requirement of a model of a machine at polls for voters' instruction, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 3. For current law, see §§2-5-210 and2-5-213.

2-5-213. Instruction facilities for voters.

The county election commission shall, where voting machines are used, provide adequate facilities for the instruction of voters prior to each election. The commission shall have in one (1) or more convenient public places a voting machine with samples of ballot labels affixed for the purpose of instructing voters in the operation of the machine. The samples of ballot labels may not contain the names of or names similar to those of candidates in the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-519.

2-5-214. Ballot boxes.

The county election commission shall furnish for each polling place and for absentee voting at the commission office, locks and standard ballot boxes made of metal or such other material deemed as safe, durable, and secure by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission.

The coordinator of elections shall prescribe the dimensions for such boxes, making allowance for the differences in numbers of voters using paper ballots at the various polling places.

The county election commission shall prescribe and provide the type of lock and seals to be used.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-520; Acts 1985, ch. 78, § 1; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 15, 21; 1994, ch. 859, § 9.

Cross-References. Sealed absentee ballots, §2-6-311.

2-5-215. Bound duplicate registration records.

The county election commission shall provide for each polling place at all elections the bound duplicate registration records of all persons registered at the polling place.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-521.

2-5-216. Supplies for each polling place.

The county election commission shall provide for each polling place:

Duplicate poll list forms on which to list the names of voters made so that writing on one (1) sheet makes an exact copy on the second sheet, and duplicate poll books;

The application for ballot forms shall contain a certification by the applicant that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter in the precinct in which the applicant is offering to vote and requests a ballot to vote in the election. The application shall contain a space for the initials of the precinct registrar approving the application and for ballot numbers and shall contain a printed application number. If a primary election is being held, the application shall include a place for the voter to indicate the voter's party;

Duplicate tally sheets which shall include the name of each candidate and question to be voted on at the polling place in the order in which they appear on the ballot and blanks for the names of write-in candidates. There shall be a space with each name or question for recording votes by paper ballot and, where voting machines are used, by voting machine and the total vote; and

Duplicate record sheets for counting paper ballots.

If a county is using a computerized voter registration system which has been approved by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission, and if the county legislative body approves by resolution the use of a computer printout instead of the duplicate registration records, the county election commission shall provide for each polling place the following:

A printout containing the names and addresses of all eligible voters at the polling place and a space for the signature of each voter;

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b)(1)(A), in any county having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand nine hundred (77,900) nor more than seventy-eight thousand (78,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census in which a computerized voter registration system which has been approved by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission is in use, the county election commission shall provide for each polling place a printout containing the names and addresses of all eligible voters at the polling place and a space for the signature of each voter. This use of the computerized printout at each polling place instead of both the printout and the duplicate registration records requires an authorizing resolution approved by the county legislative body by a two-thirds (2/3) vote;

The application for ballot forms containing the certification required in subdivision (a)(2); provided, that ballot applications need not be provided in any county which uses Votomatic or a comparable punch card voting system;

Duplicate tally sheets containing the information required in subdivision (a)(3); and

Duplicate record sheets for counting paper ballots.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-522; Acts 1989, ch. 590, § 3; 1990, ch. 953, § 1; 1990, ch. 954, § 1; 1990, ch. 956, § 1; 1990, ch. 959, § 1; 1990, ch. 1020, § 1; 1990, ch. 1084, § 1; 1991, ch. 99, § 1; 1991, ch. 302, § 1; 1992, ch. 536, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 480, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1992, ch. 536, § 3 provided that any approval granted under prior law by a county legislative body prior to March 12, 1992, shall continue in full force and effect until such approval is revoked by a comparable action of a county legislative body.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Additional supplies, §2-3-108.

Ballot supplies for persons with visual impairments, §2-5-218.

Number of paper ballots for each polling place, §2-5-209.

2-5-217. Ballot boxes paid for by state.

All ballot boxes shall be paid for by the state.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-523.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

2-5-218. Ballot supplies for persons with visual impairments.

All nominating petitions, instruction cards, application for ballot forms, and the rules and regulations regarding qualifying for public office may be made available in large print, and in recorded form for citizens of Tennessee with visual impairments. The above named documents and recordings must be available only at the main county election commission office.

The state's share of the funding for the implementation of this section shall be derived from state taxes currently being shared with local governments.

Acts 1979, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 2-524; Acts 1982, ch. 871, § 2.

Cross-References. Assistance to blind voters, §2-7-116.